California statutes. Financial Code
(2) For purposes of paragraph (1), an offer does not involve any public offering if the offers are not made to more than 25 persons and any agreement for the sale of the securities is not entered into with more than 10 of those 25 persons, and if all of the offerees either have a preexisting personal or business relationship with the bank or its officers, directors, or controlling persons, or by reason of their business or financial experience the offerees could be reasonably assumed to have the capacity to protect their own interests in connection with the transaction.

(b) Any stock split by a bank organized under the laws of this state that is effected pursuant to an amendment to its articles, an agreement of merger, or a certificate of ownership that has been approved
 by the commissioner, unless this exemption is withheld by order of the commissioner.

(c) Any offer or sale of securities by a bank organized under the laws of this state that is either (1) to a person actually approved by the commissioner pursuant to Section 1253 to acquire control of the bank if all of the material terms and conditions of the offer and sale of securities are disclosed in the application for approval specified in Section 1253 and the offer and sale of securities is in accordance with the terms and subject to the conditions of the approval to acquire control or (2) in a transaction exempted from the approval requirement of Section 1251 by a regulation or an order of the commissioner, unless this exemption is withheld by order of the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1203.

An application for a permit shall be in such form and contain such information as the commissioner may prescribe.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1204.

The commissioner shall charge and collect fees for applications filed under this chapter as fixed in this section.

(a) The fee for a negotiating permit shall be fifty dollars ($50).

(b) The fee for a permit to exchange a security or to make any change in the rights, preferences, privileges, or restrictions of or on outstanding securities shall be fifty dollars
 ($50).

(c) The fee for any permit to sell securities other than as specified in subdivision (b) shall be one hundred dollars ($100) plus one-tenth of one percent (0.1%) of the aggregate value of the securities sought to be sold, up to a maximum aggregate fee of one thousand seven hundred fifty dollars ($1,750).

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1205.

If the commissioner finds that the proposed sale of securities is fair, just, and equitable, he or she shall issue to the applicant a permit authorizing it to offer and sell the securities in such amount and upon such terms and conditions as he or she may provide in the permit. If the commissioner finds otherwise, he or she shall deny the application.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1206.

The commissioner may impose conditions in any permit issued under Section 1205, requiring the deposit in escrow of securities, imposing a legend condition restricting the transferability thereof, impounding the proceeds from the sale thereof, limiting the expense in connection with the sale thereof, or such other conditions as he or she deems reasonable and necessary or advisable in the public interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1207.

Every permit issued pursuant to Section 1205 shall recite that it is permissive only and does not constitute a recommendation or endorsement of the securities permitted to be sold.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1208.

The commissioner may amend, alter, suspend, or revoke any permit issued pursuant to Section 1205.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1209.

Whenever a bank applies for a permit to issue any security or to deliver any other consideration (whether or not such security or such transaction is exempt from, or not subject to, the provisions of Section 1202) in exchange for one or more bona fide outstanding securities (as defined in Section 25019 of the Corporations Code), claims, or property interests, or partly in such exchange and partly for cash, the commissioner is authorized to approve the terms and conditions of such issuance
 and exchange or such delivery and exchange and the fairness of such terms and conditions and is authorized to hold a hearing on the fairness of such terms and conditions, at which all persons to whom it is proposed to issue any security or to deliver any other consideration in such exchange shall have the right to appear.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1210.

There shall be exempted from the provisions of Section 1201 any transaction or security, including, without limitation, any type or class of transactions or securities, which the commissioner by regulation or order exempts as not being comprehended within the purposes of this chapter and the regulation of which he or she finds is not necessary or appropriate in the public interest or for the protection of investors.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1211.

A bank at any time may, with the approval of its board, issue, sell or hypothecate its capital notes or debentures which may be payable upon such terms and may bear such rate of interest, if any, as may be provided therein or which may be convertible into shares. Such capital notes and debentures shall be subordinate to the claims of creditors and depositors and it shall be provided in any such capital notes or debentures that in the event of liquidation all depositors and other creditors
 of the bank shall be entitled to be paid in full with such interest as may be provided by law before any payment shall be made on account of principal of or interest on such capital notes or debentures and it may be provided in any such capital notes or debentures that after payment in full of all sums owing to such depositors and creditors the holders of such capital notes or debentures shall be entitled to be paid from the remaining assets of the bank the unpaid principal amount of the capital notes or debentures plus accrued and unpaid interest thereon before any payment or other distribution, whether in cash, property or otherwise, shall be made on account of any shares of the bank. It shall be provided in such capital notes or debentures that no payment shall at any time be made on account of the principal thereof, unless following such payment the aggregate of the shareholders’ equity and capital notes or debentures thereafter outstanding shall be the equal of such aggregate at the date of the original
 issue of such capital notes or debentures, or as may be otherwise authorized by the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1212.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall affect the Corporate Securities Law of 1968, Division 1 (commencing with Section 25000) of Title 4 of the Corporations Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7. Acquisition of Control [1250. - 1263.]

1250.

Unless the context otherwise requires, in this chapter:

(a) “Bank” means a bank organized under the laws of this state.

(b) “Control” means possession, direct or indirect, of the power:

(1) To vote 25 percent or more of any class of the voting securities issued by a person; or

(2) To direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of a person, whether through the ownership of voting securities, by contract (other than a commercial contract for goods or nonmanagement services), or otherwise; provided, however, that no individual shall be deemed to control a person solely on account of being a director, officer, or employee of such person.

For purposes of paragraph (2) of this subdivision, a person who, directly or indirectly, owns, controls, holds with the power to vote, or holds proxies representing, 10 percent or more of the then outstanding voting securities issued by another person is presumed to control such other person.

For purposes of this chapter, the commissioner may determine whether a person in fact controls another person.

(c) “Controlling person”
 means a person who, directly or indirectly, controls a bank.

(d) “Person” means an individual, a corporation, an association, a syndicate, a partnership, a limited liability company, a business trust, an estate, a trust, or an organization of any kind, or any combination of any of the foregoing acting in concert.

(e) “Shareholder” means:

(1) In the case of a corporation, a holder of a share of any class or series.

(2) In the case of a nonprofit or charitable corporation, an unincorporated association, or a syndicate, a member.

(3) In the case of a partnership, a partner.

(4) In the case of a business trust, an estate, or a
 trust, a holder of a beneficial interest.

(5) In the case of an organization of any other kind, a holder of an ownership interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1251.

No person shall, directly or indirectly, unless the commissioner has approved such acquisition of control, do any of the following:

(a) Make a tender offer for, a request or invitation for tenders of, or an offer to exchange securities for, any voting security or any security convertible into a voting security of a bank or a controlling person if the person making such tender offer, request or invitation for tenders, or offer
 to exchange securities would, by consummation thereof, directly or indirectly, acquire control of such bank or such controlling person.

(b) Solicit approval of any shareholder of a controlling person for a merger, consolidation, sale of assets, or other transaction by which any person other than such controlling person would acquire control of the bank controlled by such controlling person.

(c) Acquire control of a bank or a controlling person; provided, however, that nothing in this subdivision shall be deemed to prohibit any person from negotiating to acquire (but not acquiring) control of a bank or a controlling person.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1252.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, except for those persons approved by the commissioner prior to September 1, 2002, and for those persons who control industrial banks as of September 1, 2002, no person may directly or indirectly, including through any merger, consolidation, or any other type of business combination, acquire control of an industrial bank, as defined in Section 111, unless the person is engaged only in the activities permitted for financial holding
 companies, as provided in Section 103 of the federal Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act (12 U.S.C. Sec. 1843(k)(1)), or is a credit union, as defined in Section 165, when the industrial bank is a credit union service organization, as defined in Section 14651. Nothing in this section shall be construed to exempt a person seeking to acquire control of a bank that otherwise qualifies to do so pursuant to this section, from the requirements of Sections 1250 to 1263, inclusive. For the purposes of this section, the term “control” has the same meaning as in subdivision (b) of Section 1250.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1253.

An application for approval to acquire control of a bank or a controlling person shall be in such form and contain such information as the commissioner may require by regulation or order and shall be accompanied by the following fee:

(a) In case the applicant has been a director or officer of the bank for not less than two years (or, if the bank has been in business for less than two years, for such lesser period), a fee of
 five hundred dollars ($500); and

(b) In any other case, a fee of one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500).

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1254.

If the commissioner finds, with respect to the proposed acquisition of control of a bank or a controlling person, that any of the factors set forth in subdivisions (a) to (g), inclusive, is true, he or she shall deny the application. If the commissioner finds that none of such factors is true, he or she shall approve the application.

(a) That the proposed acquisition of control would result in a monopoly or would be in
 furtherance of any combination or conspiracy to monopolize or to attempt to monopolize the business of banking in any part of this state;

(b) That the effect of the proposed acquisition of control in any section of the state may be substantially to lessen competition or to tend to create a monopoly or that the proposed acquisition of control would in any other manner be in restraint of trade, and that the anticompetitive effects of the proposed acquisition of control are not clearly outweighed in the public interest by the probable effect of the transaction in meeting the convenience and needs of the community to be served;

(c) That the financial condition of any acquiring person is such as might jeopardize the financial stability of the bank or the controlling person, or prejudice the interests of the depositors, creditors, or shareholders of the bank or the controlling
 person;

(d) That plans or proposals to liquidate the bank or the controlling person, to sell the assets of the bank or the controlling person, to merge or consolidate the bank or the controlling person, or to make any other major change in the business, corporation structure or management of the bank or the controlling person are not fair and reasonable to the depositors, creditors, and shareholders of the bank or the controlling person;

(e) That the competence, experience, or integrity of any acquiring person indicates that it would not be in the interest of the depositors, creditors, or shareholders of the bank or the controlling person or in the interest of the public to permit such person to control the bank or the controlling person;

(f) That the proposed acquisition is unfair, unjust, or inequitable to the bank
 or the controlling person or to the depositors, creditors, or shareholders of the bank or the controlling person; or

(g) That the applicant neglects, fails, or refuses to furnish to the commissioner all the information required by the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1255.

(a) For purposes of Section 1254, the commissioner may find:

(1) That the integrity of an acquiring person indicates that it would not be in the interest of the depositors, creditors, or shareholders of a bank or controlling person or in the interest of the public to permit the acquiring person to control the bank or controlling person if the acquiring person or any director or officer of the acquiring person has been convicted of, or has pleaded nolo contendere to, any crime involving fraud or dishonesty.

(2) That a plan to make a major change in the management of a bank or controlling person is not fair and reasonable to the
 depositors, creditors, or shareholders of the bank or controlling person if the plan provides for a person who has been convicted of, or has pleaded nolo contendere to, any crime involving fraud or dishonesty to become a director or officer of the bank or controlling person.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall not be deemed to be the only grounds upon which the commissioner may find, for purposes of Section 1254, that the integrity of an acquiring person indicates that it would not be in the interest of the depositors, creditors, or shareholders of a bank or controlling person or in the interest of the public to permit the acquiring person to control the bank or controlling person or that a plan to make a major change in the management of a bank or controlling person is not fair and reasonable to the depositors, creditors, or shareholders of the
 bank or controlling person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 334, Sec. 35.   (SB 537)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

1256.

The commissioner may, in approving a proposal to acquire control of a bank or a controlling person pursuant to Section 1254, impose such conditions as the commissioner deems reasonable or necessary or advisable in the public interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1257.

The commissioner may, for good cause, amend, alter, suspend, or revoke any approval of a proposal to acquire control of a bank or a controlling person issued pursuant to Section 1254.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1258.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, any application for approval to acquire control of a bank or a controlling person which is not denied or approved by the commissioner within a period of 60 days after such application is filed with the commissioner or, if the applicant consents to an extension of the period within which the commissioner may act, within such extended period, shall be deemed to be approved by the commissioner as of the first day after such period of 60
 days or such extended period, as the case may be.

For purposes of this section, an application for approval to acquire control of a bank or a controlling person is deemed to be filed with the commissioner at the time when the complete application, including any amendments or supplements, containing all the information in the form required by the commissioner, is received by him or her.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1259.

(a) The commissioner, before determining whether, for purposes of this chapter, a person controls another person or before denying or approving an application for approval to acquire control of a bank or controlling person, may hold a hearing.

(b) After determining whether, for purposes of this chapter, a person controls another person or after denying or approving an application for approval to acquire
 control of a bank or controlling person, the commissioner, upon the filing of a written request for a hearing by any person prejudiced by the commissioner’s decision, shall hold a hearing and upon such hearing shall affirm, modify, or reverse his or her decision. Any such hearing shall commence within a period of 30 days after the written request for the hearing is filed with the commissioner or, if the person filing the written request for the hearing consents to an extension of the period within which the hearing is to commence, within such extended period.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1260.

There shall be exempted from the provisions of Section 1251 any transaction, including, without limitation, any type or class of transactions, which the commissioner by regulation or order exempts as not being comprehended within the purposes of this chapter and the regulation of which the commissioner finds is not necessary or appropriate in the public interest or for the protection of a bank, a controlling person, or the depositors, creditors, or shareholders of a bank or a controlling
 person.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1261.

Whenever it appears to the commissioner that any person has committed or is about to commit a violation of any provision of this chapter or of any regulation or order of the commissioner issued pursuant to this chapter, the commissioner may apply to the superior court for an order enjoining such person from violating or continuing to violate this chapter or any such regulation or order and for other equitable relief as the nature of the case or the interests of the bank, the controlling
 person, the depositors, creditors, or shareholders of such bank or such controlling person, or the public may require.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1262.

No person shall be entitled to vote or to give a written consent with respect to any security acquired in contravention of any provision of this chapter or of any regulation or order of the commissioner issued pursuant to this chapter for a period of three years after such acquisition. If a security of a bank or a controlling person is acquired in contravention of this chapter or any such regulation or order, such bank, such controlling person, any shareholder of such bank or such
 controlling person, or the commissioner may apply to the superior court for equitable relief, including costs and (except with respect to the commissioner) attorney fees, to enjoin prospectively any person from voting or giving any written consent with respect to such security for a period of three years after such acquisition, and the commissioner may apply to the superior court for equitable relief, including costs, to void any voting or any giving of a written consent with respect to such security which has occurred since such acquisition.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1263.

If any provision or clause of this chapter or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, illegal, or unenforceable, such invalidity, illegality, or unenforceability shall not affect other provisions or applications of this article which can be given effect without the invalid, illegal, or unenforceable provision or application, and to this end, the provisions of this chapter are declared to be severable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 8. Bank Holding Companies [1280. - 1287.]

1280.

“Bank holding company” means:

(a) Any person or company which:

(1) Directly or indirectly owns, controls, or holds with power to vote, 10 percent or more of the outstanding stock of any domestic bank, or 10 percent or more of the outstanding stock of any domestic bank together with 10 percent or more of the shares or proxy of shares of any national bank located
 in California.

(2) Controls in any manner whether by the holding of proxy, or otherwise, the election of a majority of the directors of any domestic bank, or of both any domestic bank and any national bank located in California.

(3) The commissioner determines, after reasonable notice and opportunity for hearing, directly or indirectly exercises, or has power to exercise, a controlling influence over the management and policies of any domestic bank, or of both any domestic bank and any national bank located in California.

(b) Any company which controls in any manner any company which is or becomes a bank holding company by virtue of this chapter.

(c) Bank holding company does not include a trust company controlled by or under common control with a title
 insurance company.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1281.

“Company” means any domestic or foreign corporation, voting trust, business trust, limited partnership, partnership fund, joint stock company, association, syndicate, organized group of persons, or similar organization or group, whether incorporated or not.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1282.

“Subsidiaries,” with respect to a specified bank holding company, means:

(a) Any company 10 percent or more of whose voting securities are directly or indirectly owned or controlled by such bank holding company;

(b) Any company a majority of whose directors are controlled in any manner by such holding company;

(c) Any company 10 percent or more of whose voting securities are held by trustees or nontrustees for the benefit of the stockholders, shareholders, or members of such holding company; or

(d) Any company 10 percent or more of the legal or beneficial ownership of which is directly or indirectly owned or controlled by such holding company.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1283.

The commissioner may from time to time require, under oath or otherwise, reports from any bank holding company and its subsidiaries in such form and as to such matters as the commissioner may deem necessary and appropriate, and which are relevant to the jurisdiction and responsibilities of the commissioner under this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1284.

Each bank holding company and its subsidiaries shall be subject to examination by the commissioner. The commissioner may use, for this purpose, his or her own examiners or independent public accountants who are disinterested persons. In lieu of making an examination, the commissioner may accept the examination of any holding company made by any federal agency, any other agency of this state, or any agency of any other state of the United States and may examine any such holding company in
 conjunction with these agencies. If the commissioner examines a bank holding company or any of its subsidiaries, other than a domestic bank, using the commissioner’s own examiners, the bank holding company shall pay, within 10 days after receipt of a statement from the commissioner, a fee of two hundred dollars ($200) per day for each examiner engaged in the examination plus, in the event it is necessary for any examiner engaged in the examination to travel outside this state, the travel expenses of the examiner. If the commissioner examines a bank holding company or any of its subsidiaries, other than a domestic bank, using independent public accountants, the bank holding company shall pay, within 10 days after receipt of a statement from the commissioner, the fee of the independent public accountants.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1285.

With respect to a trust company controlled by or under common control with a title insurance company, the commissioner in cooperation with the Insurance Commissioner shall adopt reasonable rules and regulations for the conduct of the inspection and examination authorized by Sections 1282 and 1284. Any such examination or inspection shall be conducted pursuant to the provisions of Article 4.7 (commencing with Section 1215) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 1 of the Insurance
 Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1286.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to authorize the commissioner to require reports from a national bank or to examine a national bank contrary to federal law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1287.

Pursuant to the authority contained in Section 1 of Article XV of the California Constitution, the restrictions upon rates of interest contained in Section 1 of Article XV of the California Constitution shall not apply to any obligations of, loans made or arranged by, or forbearances of or arranged by, a bank holding company or a subsidiary of a bank holding company which is not a bank. As used in this section, the terms “bank holding company” and “subsidiary” mean a bank holding company
 or subsidiary as defined in Chapter 17 (commencing with Section 1841) of Title 12 of the United States Code.

This section creates and authorizes an exempt class of persons pursuant to Section 1 of Article XV of the Constitution. This section does not exempt a bank holding company or a subsidiary of a bank holding company from complying with all other applicable provisions of law regulating the business of these companies.

This section does not exempt a bank holding company or a subsidiary thereof from complying with all other laws or regulations governing the business in which the bank holding company or subsidiary is engaged.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 9. Authorizations for Banks [1300. - 1301.]

1300.

(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of Sections 1051, 1052, and 1054 of the Labor Code and Section 2947 of the Penal Code, a bank or any affiliate thereof, licensed under the laws of any state or of the United States, may require a director, an officer, an employee, or an applicant for employment to undergo a fingerprint-based state criminal history background check.

(b) If, upon evaluation of the criminal history information received pursuant to this section, the bank or affiliate determines that employment of the person fingerprinted would constitute an unreasonable risk to that bank or affiliate or its customers, the person may be denied employment.

(c) Banks and their affiliates shall submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information for individuals specified in subdivision (a) who are subject to a state criminal history background check pursuant to subdivision (u) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.

(d) The Department of Justice shall provide a state response pursuant to subdivision (o) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.

(e) A bank or affiliate may request from the Department of Justice subsequent arrest notification service, as provided pursuant to Section 11105.2 of the Penal Code, for persons described in subdivision (a).

(f) Any criminal history information obtained
 pursuant to this section is confidential and no recipient shall disclose its contents other than for the purpose for which it was acquired.

(g) “Affiliate,” as used in this section, means any corporation controlling, controlled by, or under common control with, a bank, whether directly, indirectly, or through one or more intermediaries.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 313, Sec. 11.   (AB 2796)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1301.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 726 of the Code of Civil Procedure or any other provision of law to the contrary, a state or nationally chartered bank, its subsidiaries or affiliates transacting business in this state, or any successor in interest thereto, that originates, acquires, or purchases, in whole or in part, any loan secured directly or collaterally, in whole or in part, by a mortgage or deed of trust on real property, or any interest therein, may bring an action
 for recovery of damages, including exemplary damages not to exceed 50 percent of the actual damages, against a borrower where the action is based on fraud under Section 1572 of the Civil Code and the fraudulent conduct by the borrower induced the original lender to make that loan.

(b) The provisions of this section shall not apply to loans secured by single-family, owner-occupied residential real property, when the property is actually occupied by the borrower as represented to the lender in order to obtain the loan and the loan is for an amount of one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) or less, as adjusted annually, commencing on January 1, 1987, to the Consumer Price Index as published by the United States Department of Labor.

(c) Any action maintained under this section for damages shall not constitute a money judgment for deficiency or a deficiency judgment within the
 meaning of Section 580a, 580b, or 580d of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 10. Restrictions and Prohibited Practices [1320. - 1367.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [1320. - 1341.]

1320.

A bank or trust company may purchase, acquire, hold, or lease real property or an interest therein only as follows:

(a) Such as may be necessary or convenient for the use, operation or housing of its head office and branch offices, or for the storage of records or other personal property, or for office space for use by its officers or employees, or which may be reasonably necessary for future expansion of its business, or
 which is otherwise reasonably related to the conduct of its business. Real property used by a bank as its banking premises may include in addition to the space required for the transaction of its business other space which may be let as a source of income.

(b) Such as may be conveyed to it in satisfaction in whole or in part of debts previously contracted in the course of its business.

(c) Such as it may purchase or acquire at foreclosure sales under mortgages or deeds of trust held by it, or under judgments or decrees in its favor.

(d) Such as it may purchase or otherwise acquire when necessary to minimize or prevent the loss or destruction of any lien or interest therein.

(e) Such as it may purchase or otherwise acquire pursuant to Section 1322.

A bank or trust company may sell, lease, or encumber real property or any interest therein owned by it, or, with the written approval of the commissioner, exchange the same for other real property.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1321.

Any real property not held for any purpose permitted by subdivisions (a) and (e) of Section 1320 shall be sold whenever the same can be sold for an amount sufficient to reimburse the bank or trust company for all loss arising out of the loan for which such real property was security or arising out of the original investment. A bank or trust company shall not by the retention of any real property acquired pursuant to this section engage in any business not authorized by this division
 except to the extent necessary in the orderly liquidation of an indebtedness owing to the bank.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1322.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares:

(1) That it is necessary to increase job opportunities in real estate development and construction and to provide additional housing and commercial facilities in this state.

(2) That within the commercial banking community there exists the expertise and ability to promote and assist in expansion of
 real estate development projects in this state.

(3) That it is proper and appropriate to utilize that expertise and ability by authorizing commercial banks to engage in real estate development and management on an entrepreneurial basis.

(b) As used in this section, “real property investment” means all forms of investing in real property, whether direct or in the form of partnerships, joint ventures, or other methods of investment. It includes, but is not limited to, the purchasing, subdividing, and developing of real property or any interest therein, the building of residential housing or commercial improvements, and the owning, renting, leasing, managing, operating for income, or selling of that property.

(c) A commercial bank may acquire and hold stock of one or more corporations the primary activities of which are
 engaging in real property investment, in which event the sum of (1) investments made by a commercial bank pursuant to the authority of this subdivision, (2) any loans and guarantees extended by a commercial bank to, or for the benefit of, corporations whose stock it holds pursuant to the authority of this subdivision, and (3) real property investments made pursuant to the authority of subdivision (d), unless a higher percentage is approved by the commissioner in writing, shall not exceed 10 percent of the total assets of the bank.

(d) A commercial bank may engage in real property investment. The total of all real property investments made pursuant to the authority of this subdivision, unless a higher percentage is approved by the commissioner in writing, shall not exceed the total shareholders’ equity of the bank.

(e) Prior to initially engaging in real property investment
 activities authorized by this section, a commercial bank shall make application with the commissioner for approval of its general plan of real property investment. The application for approval shall be in letter form, shall contain a copy of the general plan for real property investment as approved or adopted by the board of directors of the bank, which shall include a brief description of either the activities of the corporations the bank will invest in or the activities the bank will engage in, or both, the approximate amount to be invested, the extent, if any, of diversification of those activities or investment, and the approximate date of the initial investment, and shall be signed by the chief executive officer of the bank. Unless the commissioner finds (1) that the capital, assets, management, earnings, and liquidity of the commercial bank are, on a composite basis, not satisfactory, or (2) that the plan for the commercial bank to engage in real property investment or to acquire and hold the stock of
 one or more real property investment corporations is unsafe or unsound, the commissioner shall approve the application. An application for approval shall be deemed approved on the 46th day after the application is filed with the commissioner, unless the commissioner earlier makes a final decision on the application or extends the period for approving or denying the application. For purposes of this subdivision, an application for approval shall be deemed to be filed with the commissioner on the date when the application, substantially in compliance with the requirements of this subdivision, is received by the commissioner. Upon the filing of the application for approval, the applicant shall pay to the commissioner a filing fee of five hundred dollars ($500).

(f) The legality of any investment lawfully made pursuant to this section as it read prior to the amendment of this section shall not be affected by the existing form of this section, nor